Louisiana, session 2026, HB36.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1109.1(A)(1) through (8) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 15:1109.1(C) and 1109.5(D) and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1109.1. Board of commissioners; appointments; terms
A. The Acadiana Regional Juvenile Justice District Commission is hereby
created to control, administer, and manage the affairs of the district. The commission
shall be composed of a board of eleven commissioners who shall be appointed as
follows:
(1) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Acadia Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
district attorney for the Fifteenth Judicial District, and the sheriff of Acadia Parish,
and the police jury president of a parish having a population of more than fifty seven
thousand five hundred and less than fifty eight thousand persons according to the
most recent federal decennial census, for an initial term of four years.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 36 ENROLLED
(2) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in Allen Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Thirty-Third Judicial District, and the sheriff of Allen Parish, and the
police jury president of a parish having a population of more than twenty two
thousand five hundred and less than twenty three thousand persons according to the
most recent federal decennial census, for an initial term of four years.
(3) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Evangeline Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
district attorney for the Thirteenth Judicial District, and the sheriff of Evangeline
Parish, and the police jury president of a parish having a population of more than
thirty two thousand three hundred and less than thirty three thousand persons
according to the most recent federal decennial census, for an initial term of four
years.
(4) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Iberia Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney of the Sixteenth Judicial District, and the sheriff of Iberia Parish, and the
president of a parish having a population of more than sixty nine thousand and less
than seventy thousand persons according to the most recent federal decennial census,
for an initial term of four years.
(5) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in Jefferson Davis Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
district attorney for the Thirty-First Judicial District, and the sheriff of Jefferson
Davis Parish, and the police jury president of a parish having a population of more
than thirty two thousand two hundred and less than thirty two thousand three
hundred persons according to the most recent federal decennial census, for an initial
term of four years.
(6) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in St. Landry Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
district attorney for the Twenty-Seventh Judicial District, and the sheriff of St.
Landry Parish, and the president of a parish having a population of more than eighty
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 36 ENROLLED
two thousand and less than eighty three thousand persons according to the most
recent federal decennial census, for an initial term of four years.
(7) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within St. Martin Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
district attorney for the Sixteenth Judicial District, and the sheriff of St. Martin
Parish, and the police jury president of a parish having a population of more than
fifty one thousand five hundred and less than fifty two thousand persons according
to the most recent federal decennial census, for an initial term of four years.
(8) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in St. Mary Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Sixteenth Judicial District, and the sheriff of St. Mary Parish, and the
police jury president of a parish having a population of more than forty nine
thousand and less than fifty thousand persons according to the most recent federal
decennial census, for an initial term of four years.
* * *
C. Failure of appointed members to attend two consecutive meetings shall
be cause for termination from the commission and the position shall be deemed
vacant by notifying the appropriate appointing party. The appointing authority shall
have ninety days to fill the vacancy.
* * *
§1109.5. Power to levy taxes, incur debt, and issue bonds
* * *
D. The board shall provide written notice, at least thirty days prior to the date
of any meeting, at which the board may consider and take action on a matter set forth
in this Section, and such written notice shall be provided to the governing authority
of each of the parishes that comprise the Acadiana Regional Juvenile Justice District.
E. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 15:1109.3(C), any action or
resolution authorizing the levy of a tax pursuant to this Section shall be required to
be approved by every member of the board and shall be subsequently approved, by
written resolution or other authorized form, by the governing authority of each of the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 36 ENROLLED
parishes that comprise the Acadiana Regional Juvenile Justice District, prior to any
such measure being placed on the ballot.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.